Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-310
Automobile liability policy, defined.

Automobile liability policy means liability insurance written by an insurance carrier duly authorized to do business in this state protecting other persons from damages for liability on account of accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of the insurance arising out of the ownership of a motor vehicle (1) in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident, (2) subject to the limit for one person, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and (3) in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars because of injury to or destruction of property of other persons in any one accident. An automobile liability policy shall not exclude liability coverage under the policy solely because the injured person making a claim is the named insured in the policy or residing in the household with the named insured.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 10.